Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2629.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 43-1111, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE43-1111. Tax rates for corporations; minimum A. There shall be levied, collected and paid for each taxable year upon on the entire Arizona taxable income of every corporation, unless exempt under section 43-1126 or 43-1201 or as otherwise provided in this title or by law, taxes in an amount of the greater of fifty dollars $50 or: 1. For taxable years beginning through December 31, 2013, 6.968 per cent percent of net income. 2. For taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2013 through December 31, 2014, 6.5 per cent percent of net income. 3. For taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2014 through December 31, 2015, 6.0 per cent percent of net income. 4. For taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2015 through December 31, 2016, 5.5 per cent percent of net income. 5. For taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2016, 4.9 per cent percent of net income. B. Notwithstanding subsection A of this section, the minimum tax amount for a corporation that has fifty or more employees and that is not otherwise exempt from tax under this title is $1,000. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Applicability Section 43-1111, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act, applies to taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2026. Sec. 3. Requirements for enactment; two-thirds vote Pursuant to article IX, section 22, Constitution of Arizona, this act is effective only on the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the members of each house of the legislature and is effective immediately on the signature of the governor or, if the governor vetoes this act, on the subsequent affirmative vote of at least three-fourths of the members of each house of the legislature.